Louisiana, session 2026, HB453.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 3-B of Title 45 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 45:151, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 3-B. VEGETATION MAINTENANCE
§151. Vegetation maintenance requirements.
A. As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Commission" means the Public Service Commission.
(2) "Utility infrastructure" means cables, wires, towers, poles, and other
above ground equipment and appliances which are owned and maintained by a utility
provider on public property.
(3) "Utility provider" means a provider of water, gas, or electric service that
is regulated by the commission or a local governmental subdivision or owned or
operated by a local governmental subdivision.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-250 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 453
B. A utility provider shall maintain all plants, trees, and other vegetation so
that the vegetation is no more and no less than four feet from the utility provider's
utility infrastructure.
C. The commission shall adopt reasonable rules, regulations, and modes of
procedure, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, to enforce the
provisions of this Chapter.